California statutes. Water Code
Each regional board, with respect to its region, shall do all of the following:

(a) Coordinate with the state board and other regional boards, as well as other state agencies with responsibility for water quality, with respect to water quality control matters, including the prevention and abatement of water pollution and nuisance.

(b) Encourage and assist in waste disposal programs, as needed and feasible, and upon application of any person, advise the applicant of the condition to be maintained in any disposal area or receiving waters into which the waste is being discharged.

(c) Require as necessary any state or local agency to investigate and report on any technical factors involved in water quality control or to obtain and submit analyses of water; provided that the burden, including costs, of such reports shall bear a reasonable relationship to the need for the report and the benefits to be obtained therefrom.

(d) Request enforcement by appropriate federal, state and local agencies of their respective water quality control laws.

(e) Report rates of compliance with the requirements of this division.

(f) Recommend to the state board projects which the regional board considers eligible for any financial assistance which may be available through the state board.

(g) Report to the state board and appropriate local health officer any case of suspected contamination in its region.

(h) File with the state board, at its request, copies of the record of any official action.

(i) Take into consideration the effect of its actions pursuant to this chapter on the California Water Plan adopted or revised pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 10000) and on any other general or coordinated governmental plan looking toward the development, utilization, or conservation of the water resources of the state.

(j) Encourage coordinated regional planning and action for water quality control.

(k) In consultation with the state board, identify and post on the Internet a summary list of all enforcement actions undertaken by that regional board and the dispositions of those actions, including any fines assessed. This list shall be updated at least quarterly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 293, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

13226.

Consistent with classifications adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 13172, each regional board shall review and classify any proposed or currently operating waste disposal site, except any sewage treatment plant or any site which primarily contains fertilizer or radioactive material, within its region.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 90, Sec. 5.   Effective March 2, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

13227.

(a) Each regional board, with respect to its region, shall review the facility closure and postclosure plans submitted pursuant to Section 25246 of the Health and Safety Code, to ensure that water quality is adequately protected during closure and the post-closure maintenance period.

(b) The regional board shall approve the facility closure and postclosure plans if it finds that the plans comply with applicable state and federal laws and regulations relating to water quality protection and monitoring.

(c) The regional board may condition its approval of the plans in accordance with the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1631, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

13228.

(a) Concerning any matter that may be submitted to a regional board by a person or entity that is subject to regulation by more than one regional board, the person or entity may submit the matter to one of those regional boards if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The person or entity submits a written request to all affected regional boards that one regional board be designated to regulate the matter.

(2) All affected regional boards agree in writing to the designation. Unless the board of any affected regional board denies the request, the executive officer of a regional board may grant a request submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) on behalf of that board.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any regional board that is affected by a matter for which a designation is made in accordance with subdivision (a) may take enforcement action with regard to that matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 536, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

13228.14.

(a) Any hearing or investigation by a regional board relating to investigating the quality of waters of the state, prescribing waste discharge requirements, issuing cease and desist orders, requiring the cleanup or abatement of waste, or imposing administrative civil liabilities or penalties may be conducted by a panel of three or more members of the regional board, but any final action in the matter shall be taken by the regional board. Due notice of any hearing shall be given to all affected persons. After a hearing, the panel shall report its proposed decision and order to the regional board and shall supply a copy to all parties who appeared at the hearing and requested a copy.

(b) No party who appears before the panel is precluded from appearing before the regional board at any subsequent hearing relating to the matter. Members of the panel are not disqualified from sitting as members of the regional board in deciding the matter.

(c) The regional board, after making an independent review of the record and taking additional evidence as may be necessary, may adopt, with or without revision, or reject, the proposed decision and order of the panel.

(d) For each meeting agenda notice that a regional board provides pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11125 of the Government Code, a regional board shall make the agenda notice available in both English and Spanish and may make the agenda notice available in any other language.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 551, Sec. 3.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

13228.15.

The members of a regional board, or their designees, with respect to matters within the regional board’s jurisdiction, may carry out prehearing conferences to address any of the matters described in subdivision (b) of Section 11511.5 of the Government Code. No party who appears at a prehearing conference is precluded from appearing before the regional board at any subsequent hearing relating to the matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 420, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Regional Water Quality Control Plans [13240. - 13249.]

13240.

Each regional board shall formulate and adopt water quality control plans for all areas within the region. Such plans shall conform to the policies set forth in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 13000) of this division and any state policy for water quality control. During the process of formulating such plans the regional boards shall consult with and consider the recommendations of affected state and local agencies. Such plans shall be periodically reviewed and may be revised.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13241.

Each regional board shall establish such water quality objectives in water quality control plans as in its judgment will ensure the reasonable protection of beneficial uses and the prevention of nuisance; however, it is recognized that it may be possible for the quality of water to be changed to some degree without unreasonably affecting beneficial uses. Factors to be considered by a regional board in establishing water quality objectives shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following:

(a) Past, present, and probable future beneficial uses of water. 

(b) Environmental characteristics of the hydrographic unit under consideration, including the quality of water available thereto. 

(c) Water quality conditions that could reasonably be achieved through the coordinated control of all factors which affect water quality in the area. 

(d) Economic considerations. 

(e) The need for developing housing within the region. 

(f) The need to develop and use recycled water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 187, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13242.

The program of implementation for achieving water quality objectives shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) A description of the nature of actions which are necessary to achieve the objectives, including recommendations for appropriate action by any entity, public or private.

(b) A time schedule for the actions to be taken.

(c) A description of surveillance to be undertaken to determine compliance with objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13243.

A regional board, in a water quality control plan or in waste discharge requirements, may specify certain conditions or areas where the discharge of waste, or certain types of waste, will not be permitted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13244.

The regional boards shall not adopt any water quality control plan unless a public hearing is first held, after the giving of notice of such hearing by publication in the affected county or counties pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. When the plan proposes to prohibit discharges of waste pursuant to Section 13243, similar notice shall be given by publication pursuant to Section 6061.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13245.

A water quality control plan, or a revision thereof adopted by a regional board, shall not become effective unless and until it is approved by the state board. The state board may approve such plan, or return it to the regional board for further consideration and resubmission to the state board. Upon resubmission the state board may either approve or, after a public hearing in the affected region, revise and approve such plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1288.)
-------------------------------------------

13245.5.

Guidelines adopted by a regional board shall not become effective unless and until approved by the state board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 758, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13246.

(a) The state board shall act upon any water quality control plan not later than 60 days from the date the regional board submitted the plan to the state board, or 90 days from the date of resubmission of the plan.

(b) When the state board is acting upon a water quality control plan that is being amended solely for an action related to a regional board’s total maximum daily load submittal, not including submittals related to listing, the state board shall not exceed the 60-day timeline, inclusive of the time spent sending the submittal back to the regional board, unless one of the following circumstances exists:

(1) The proposed amendment is for an exceedingly complex total maximum daily load. In order to determine if a total maximum daily load is exceedingly complex, the state board may consider a number of factors including, but not limited to, the volume of the record, the number of pollutants included, the number of dischargers and land uses involved, and the size of the watershed. The reason or reasons that any total maximum daily load is determined to be exceedingly complex shall be provided by the state board to the regional board in writing.

(2) The submittal by the regional board is clearly incomplete.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 20, Sec. 2.   Effective April 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

13247.

State offices, departments, and boards, in carrying out activities which may affect water quality, shall comply with water quality control plans approved or adopted by the state board unless otherwise directed or authorized by statute, in which case they shall indicate to the regional boards in writing their authority for not complying with such plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1288.)
-------------------------------------------

13248.

(a) At any time, the state board may, on its own motion, review the regional board’s failure to act under this article.

(b) The state board may find that the failure of the regional board to act was appropriate and proper. Upon finding that the failure of the regional board to act was inappropriate or improper, the state board may direct that appropriate action be taken by the regional board, refer the matter to another state agency having jurisdiction, take appropriate action itself, or take any combination of those actions. In taking any action, the state board is vested with all the powers of the regional boards under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 21.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13249.

(a) The state board may, on behalf of itself or a regional board, accept donations of moneys from a permittee for the purpose of updating a water quality control plan as consistent with the designated use of the funds.

(b) The state board may, on behalf of itself or a regional board, accept moneys from donations, grants, or contributions, or through contractual agreements, from public agencies for the purpose of planning, permitting, or providing technical
 support for projects of public benefit within the state board’s or regional board’s jurisdiction.

(c) All funds received pursuant to this section shall be deposited, and separately accounted for, in the State Water Pollution Cleanup and Abatement Account, for expenditure in accordance with the terms of the donation, grant, contribution, or contractual agreement.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “projects of public benefit” include, but are not limited to, projects directly related to climate change adaptation, ecosystem protection and restoration, water recycling, stormwater capture, water conservation, emergency preparedness, flood management, ambient water quality monitoring, research, and environmental justice.

(e) Before accepting any moneys pursuant to this section, the state board shall provide notice of its intent to accept those moneys
 and provide a description of the associated public benefit of those moneys in accordance with the requirements governing the notice of a meeting, as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 11125 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 833, Sec. 1.   (AB 2501)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Waste Discharge Requirements [13260. - 13276.]

13260.

(a) Each of the following persons shall file with the appropriate regional board a report of the discharge, containing the information that may be required by the regional board:

(1) A person discharging waste, or proposing to discharge waste, within any region that could affect the quality of the waters of the state, other than into a community sewer system.

(2) A person who is a citizen, domiciliary, or political agency or entity of this state discharging waste, or proposing to discharge waste, outside the boundaries of the state in a manner that could affect the quality of the waters of the state within any region.

(3) A person
 operating, or proposing to construct, an injection well.

(b) A report of waste discharge need not be filed pursuant to subdivision (a) if the requirement is waived pursuant to Section 13269.

(c) Each person subject to subdivision (a) shall file with the appropriate regional board a report of waste discharge relative to any material change or proposed change in the character, location, or volume of the discharge.

(d) (1) (A) Each person who is subject to subdivision (a) or (c), or Section 13523 or 13523.1, shall submit an annual fee according to a fee schedule established by the state board.

(B) The total amount of annual fees collected pursuant to this section shall equal that amount necessary to recover costs
 incurred in connection with the issuance, administration, reviewing, monitoring, and enforcement of waste discharge requirements, waivers of waste discharge requirements, water recycling requirements, and master recycling permits.

(C) Recoverable costs may include, but are not limited to, costs incurred in reviewing waste discharge and water recycling reports; prescribing terms of waste discharge requirements, waivers of waste discharge requirements, water recycling requirements, master recycling permits, and monitoring requirements; enforcing and evaluating compliance with those requirements, waivers, and permits; conducting surface water and groundwater monitoring and modeling; analyzing laboratory samples; adopting, reviewing, and revising water quality control plans, state policies for water quality control, and recycling criteria; reviewing documents prepared for the purpose of regulating the discharge of waste or water recycling; and
 administrative costs incurred in connection with carrying out these actions.

(D) In establishing the amount of a fee that may be imposed on a confined animal feeding and holding operation pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, a dairy farm, the state board shall consider all of the following factors:

(i) The size of the operation.

(ii) Whether the operation has been issued a permit to operate pursuant to Section 1342 of Title 33 of the United States Code.

(iii) Any applicable waste discharge requirement or conditional waiver of a waste discharge requirement.

(iv) The type and amount of discharge from the operation.

(v) The pricing mechanism of the commodity produced.

(vi) Any compliance costs borne by the operation pursuant to state and federal water quality regulations.

(vii) Whether the operation participates in a quality assurance program certified by a regional water quality control board, the state board, or a federal water quality control agency.

(2) (A) Subject to subparagraph (B), the fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Waste Discharge Permit Fund, which is hereby created. The money in the fund is available for expenditure by the state board, upon appropriation by the Legislature, solely for the purposes of carrying out this division.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the fees collected pursuant to this section from stormwater dischargers that are subject to a general industrial or construction stormwater permit under the national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) shall be separately accounted for in the Waste Discharge Permit Fund.

(ii) Not less than 50 percent of the money in the Waste Discharge Permit Fund that is separately accounted for pursuant to clause (i) is available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for expenditure by the regional board with jurisdiction over the permitted industry or construction site that generated the fee to carry out stormwater programs in the region.

(iii) Each regional board that receives money pursuant to clause (ii) shall spend not less than 50 percent of that money solely on stormwater inspection and regulatory compliance issues associated
 with industrial and construction stormwater programs.

(3) A person who would be required to pay the annual fee prescribed by paragraph (1) for waste discharge requirements applicable to discharges of solid waste, as defined in Section 40191 of the Public Resources Code, at a waste management unit that is also regulated under Division 30 (commencing with Section 40000) of the Public Resources Code, shall be entitled to a waiver of the annual fee for the discharge of solid waste at the waste management unit imposed by paragraph (1) upon verification by the state board of payment of the fee imposed by Section 48000 of the Public Resources Code, and provided that the fee established pursuant to Section 48000 of the Public Resources Code generates revenues sufficient to fund the programs specified in Section 48004 of the Public Resources Code and the amount appropriated by the Legislature for those purposes is not reduced.

(e) Each person that discharges waste in a manner regulated by this section shall pay an annual fee to the state board. The state board shall establish, by regulation, a timetable for the payment of the annual fee. If the state board or a regional board determines that the discharge will not affect, or have the potential to affect, the quality of the waters of the state, all or part of the annual fee shall be refunded.

(f) (1) The state board shall adopt, by emergency regulations, a schedule of fees authorized under subdivision (d). The total revenue collected each year through annual fees shall be set at an amount equal to the revenue levels set forth in the Budget Act for this activity. The state board shall automatically adjust the annual fees each fiscal year to conform with the revenue levels set forth in the Budget Act for this activity. If the state board
 determines that the revenue collected during the preceding year was greater than, or less than, the revenue levels set forth in the Budget Act, the state board may further adjust the annual fees to compensate for the over and under collection of revenue.

(2) The emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision, any amendment thereto, or subsequent adjustments to the annual fees, shall be adopted by the state board in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any emergency regulations adopted by the state board, or adjustments to the
 annual fees made by the state board pursuant to this section, are not subject to review by the Office of Administrative Law and shall remain in effect until revised by the state board.

(g) The state board shall adopt regulations setting forth reasonable time limits within which the regional board shall determine the adequacy of a report of waste discharge submitted under this section.

(h) Each report submitted under this section shall be sworn to, or submitted under penalty of perjury.

(i) The regulations adopted by the state board pursuant to subdivision (f) shall include a provision that annual fees shall not be imposed on those who pay fees under the national pollutant discharge elimination system until those fees are again due, at which time the fees shall become due on an annual basis.

(j) A person operating or proposing to construct an oil, gas, or geothermal injection well subject to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall not be required to pay a fee pursuant to subdivision (d) if the injection well is regulated by the Geologic Energy Management Division of the Department of Conservation, in lieu of the appropriate California regional water quality control board, pursuant to the memorandum of understanding, entered into between the state board and the Department of Conservation on May 19, 1988. This subdivision shall remain operative until the memorandum of understanding is revoked by the state board or the Department of Conservation.

(k) In addition to the report required by subdivision (a), before a person discharges mining waste, the person shall first submit both of the following to the regional board:

(1) A report on the physical and chemical characteristics of the waste that could affect its potential to cause pollution or contamination. The report shall include the results of all tests required by regulations adopted by the board, any test adopted by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Section 25141 of the Health and Safety Code for extractable, persistent, and bioaccumulative toxic substances in a waste or other material, and any other tests that the state board or regional board may require, including, but not limited to, tests needed to determine the acid-generating potential of the mining waste or the extent to which hazardous substances may persist in the waste after disposal.

(2) A report that evaluates the potential of the discharge of the mining waste to produce, over the long term, acid mine drainage, the discharge or leaching of heavy metals, or the
 release of other hazardous substances.

(l) Except upon the written request of the regional board, a report of waste discharge need not be filed pursuant to subdivision (a) or (c) by a user of recycled water that is being supplied by a supplier or distributor of recycled water for whom a master recycling permit has been issued pursuant to Section 13523.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 40.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13260.2.

(a) The state board shall establish a fee in an amount sufficient to recover its costs in reviewing, processing, and enforcing “no exposure” certifications issued to facilities that apply for those certifications in accordance with a general industrial stormwater permit.

(b) Revenue generated pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Waste Discharge Permit Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 4.   Effective October 28, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

13260.3.

On or before January 1 of each year, the state board shall report to the Governor and the Legislature on the expenditure of annual fees collected pursuant to Section 13260.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective October 28, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

13261.

(a) A person who fails to furnish a report or pay a fee under Section 13260 when so requested by a regional board is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be liable civilly in accordance with subdivision (b).

(b) (1) Civil liability may be administratively imposed by a regional board or the state board in accordance with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 13323) of Chapter 5 for a violation of subdivision (a) in an amount not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day in which the violation occurs. Civil liability shall not be imposed by the regional board pursuant to this section if the state board has imposed liability
 against the same person for the same violation.

(2) Civil liability may be imposed by the superior court in accordance with Article 5 (commencing with Section 13350) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 13360) of Chapter 5 for a violation of subdivision (a) in an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day the violation occurs.

(c) A person who discharges or proposes to discharge hazardous waste, as defined in Section 25117 of the Health and Safety Code, who knowingly furnishes a false report under Section 13260, or who either willfully fails to furnish a report or willfully withholds material information under Section 13260 despite actual knowledge of that requirement, may be liable in accordance with subdivision (d) and is guilty of a misdemeanor.

This subdivision does not apply to any waste discharge that is
 subject to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 13370).

(d) (1) Civil liability may be administratively imposed by a regional board in accordance with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 13323) of Chapter 5 for a violation of subdivision (c) in an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day the violation occurs.

(2) Civil liability may be imposed by the superior court in accordance with Article 5 (commencing with Section 13350) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 13360) of Chapter 5 for a violation of subdivision (c) in an amount not exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 22.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13262.

The Attorney General, at the request of the regional board or the state board, shall petition the superior court for the issuance of a temporary restraining order, temporary injunction, or permanent injunction, or combination thereof, as may be appropriate, requiring any person not complying with Section 13260 to comply therewith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 869, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

13263.

(a) The regional board, after any necessary hearing, shall prescribe requirements as to the nature of any proposed discharge, existing discharge, or material change in an existing discharge, except discharges into a community sewer system, with relation to the conditions existing in the disposal area or receiving waters upon, or into which, the discharge is made or proposed. The requirements shall implement any relevant water quality control plans that have been adopted, and shall take into consideration the beneficial uses to be protected, the water quality objectives reasonably required for that purpose, other waste discharges, the need to prevent nuisance, and the provisions of Section 13241.

(b) A regional board, in prescribing requirements, need not authorize the utilization of the full waste assimilation capacities of the receiving waters.

(c) The requirements may contain a time schedule, subject to revision in the discretion of the board.

(d) The regional board may prescribe requirements although no discharge report has been filed.

(e) Upon application by any affected person, or on its own motion, the regional board may review and revise requirements. All requirements shall be reviewed periodically.

(f) The regional board shall notify in writing the person making or proposing the discharge or the change therein of the discharge requirements to be met. After receipt of the notice, the person so notified shall provide adequate means to meet the requirements.

(g) No discharge of waste into the waters of the state, whether or not the discharge is made pursuant to waste discharge requirements, shall create a vested right to continue the discharge. All discharges of waste into waters of the state are privileges, not rights.

(h) The regional board may incorporate the requirements prescribed pursuant to this section into a master recycling permit for either a supplier or distributor, or both, of recycled water.

(i) The state board or a regional board may prescribe general waste discharge requirements for a category of discharges if the state board or that regional board finds or determines that all of the following criteria apply to the discharges in that category:

(1) The discharges are produced by the same or similar operations.

(2) The discharges involve the same or similar types of waste.

(3) The discharges require the same or similar treatment standards.

(4) The discharges are more appropriately regulated under general discharge requirements than individual discharge requirements.

(j) The state board, after any necessary hearing, may prescribe waste discharge requirements in accordance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13263.1.

Before a regional board issues or revises waste discharge requirements pursuant to Section 13263 for any discharge of mining waste, the regional board shall first determine that the proposed mining waste discharge is consistent with a waste management strategy that prevents the pollution or contamination of the waters of the state, particularly after closure of any waste management unit for mining waste.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 642, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

13263.2.

The owner or operator of a facility that treats groundwater which qualifies as a hazardous waste pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code is exempt from the requirement to obtain a hazardous waste facility permit pursuant to Section 25201 of the Health and Safety Code for the treatment of groundwater if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The facility treats groundwater which is extracted for purposes of complying with one or more of the following:

(1) Waste discharge requirements prescribed pursuant to Section 13263.

(2) A cleanup or abatement order
 issued pursuant to Section 13304.

(3) A written authorization issued by a regional board or local agency designated pursuant to Section 25283 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) An order or approved remedial action plan issued pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 78000) of Division 45 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The facility meets, at a minimum, all of the following operating standards:

(1) The treatment does not require a hazardous waste facilities permit pursuant to the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.).

(2) The facility operator prepares and maintains written operating instructions and a record of the dates, amounts, and types
 of waste treated.

(3) The facility operator prepares and maintains a written inspection schedule and log of inspections conducted.

(4) The records specified in paragraphs (2) and (3) are maintained by the owner or operator of the facility for a period of three years.

(5) The owner or operator maintains adequate records to demonstrate that it is in compliance with all of the pretreatment standards and with all of the applicable industrial waste discharge requirements issued by the agency operating the publicly owned treatment works into which the wastes are discharged.

(6) (A) Upon terminating the operation of any treatment process or unit exempted pursuant to this section, the owner or operator that conducted the treatment removes
 or decontaminates all waste residues, containment system components, soils, and other structures or equipment contaminated with hazardous waste from the unit. The removal of the unit from service shall be conducted in a manner that does both of the following:

(i) Minimizes the need for further maintenance.

(ii) Eliminates the escape of hazardous waste, hazardous constituents, leachate, contaminated runoff, or waste decomposition products to the environment after the treatment process ceases operation.

(B) Any owner or operator who permanently ceases operation of a treatment process or unit that is exempted pursuant to this section shall provide written notification to the regional board or local agency upon completion of all activities required by this subdivision.

(7) The waste is managed in accordance with all applicable requirements for generators of hazardous waste under Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code and the regulations adopted by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to that chapter.

(c) The groundwater is treated at the site where it is extracted in compliance with one or more of paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4) of subdivision (a).

(d) All other regulatory requirements applicable to the facility pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code are met by the owner or operator.

(e) The treatment of the contaminated groundwater is not performed under corrective action required by Section 25200.10 of the Health and Safety
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 124.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

13263.3.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that pollution prevention should be the first step in a hierarchy for reducing pollution and managing wastes, and to achieve environmental stewardship for society. The Legislature also finds and declares that pollution prevention is necessary to achieve the federal goal of zero discharge of pollutants into navigable waters.

(b) (1) For the purposes of this section, “pollution prevention” means any action that causes a net reduction in the use or generation of a hazardous substance or other pollutant that is discharged into water and includes any of the following:

(A) “Input change,” which means a change in raw materials or feedstocks used in a production process or operation so as to reduce, avoid, or eliminate the generation of pollutants discharged in wastewater.

(B) “Operational improvement,” which means improved site management so as to reduce, avoid, or eliminate the generation of pollutants discharged in wastewater.

(C) “Production process change,” which means a change in a process, method, or technique that is used to produce a product or a desired result, including the return of materials or their components for reuse within the existing processes or operations, so as to reduce, avoid, or eliminate the generation of pollutants discharged in wastewater.

(D) “Product reformulation,” which means changes in design, composition, or specifications of end products, including product substitution, so as to reduce, avoid, or eliminate the generation of problem pollutants discharged in wastewater.

(2) For the purposes of this section, “pollution prevention” does not include actions that merely shift a pollutant in wastewater from one environmental medium to another environmental medium, unless clear environmental benefits of such an approach are demonstrated.

(c) (1) For the purposes of this section, “discharger” means any entity required to obtain a national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) permit pursuant to the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.), or any entity subject to the pretreatment program as defined in Part 403 (commencing with Section 403.1) of subchapter N of Chapter 1 of Part 403 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) For the purposes of this section, “industrial discharger” means any discharger other than a publicly owned treatment works (POTW).

(d) (1) The state board, a regional board, or a POTW may require a discharger subject to its jurisdiction to complete a pollution prevention plan if any of the following apply:

(A) A discharger is determined to be a chronic violator and the board or the POTW determines that pollution prevention could achieve compliance.

(B) The discharger contributes, or has the potential to contribute, to the formation of a toxic hot spot as defined in Section 13391.5.

(C) The discharger discharges a pollutant for which the permitted level is lower than the practical quantification limit and the state board, a regional board, or the POTW determines that additional reductions of the pollutant are necessary.

(D) The board determines pollution prevention is necessary to achieve a water quality objective.

(2) The state board, a regional board, or a POTW may require an industrial discharger subject to its jurisdiction to complete a pollution prevention plan that includes all of the following:

(A) An analysis of the pollutants that the facility discharges into water or introduces into POTWs, a description of the sources of the pollutants, and a comprehensive review of the processes used by the discharger that result in the generation and discharge of the pollutants.

(B) An analysis of the potential for pollution prevention to reduce the generation of the pollutants, including the application of innovative and alternative technologies and any adverse environmental impacts resulting from the use of those methods.
